Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.210

Exclusive jurisdictional basis.

This chapter provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a court of this state to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for an adult under chapter 11.130 RCW.

[ 2020 c 312 s 712; 2009 c 81 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.